Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1703
Seller-assisted marketing plan, defined.

Seller-assisted marketing plan shall mean the sale or lease or offer for sale or lease of any product, equipment, supplies, services, license, or any combination thereof which will be used by or on behalf of the purchaser to begin or maintain a business when:

(1) The seller of the plan has advertised or in other manner solicited the purchase or lease of the plan; and

(2) The seller has represented directly or indirectly or orally or in writing that:

(a) The seller or a person recommended or specified by the seller will provide the purchaser with or assist the purchaser in finding locations for the use or operation of vending machines, vending routes, display racks, display cases, or other similar devices on premises neither owned nor leased by the seller or the purchaser;

(b) The seller or a person recommended or specified by the seller will provide the purchaser with or will assist the purchaser in finding outlets or accounts for the purchaser's products or services;

(c) The seller or a person specified by the seller will or is likely to purchase any or all of the products made, produced, fabricated, grown, bred, or modified by the purchaser using, in whole or in part, the product, supplies, equipment, or services which were initially sold or leased or offered for sale or lease to the purchaser by the seller;

(d) The purchaser will, is likely to, or can derive income from the business which exceeds the initial payment paid by the purchaser for participation in the plan;

(e) There is a market for the product, equipment, supplies, or services which were initially sold or leased or offered for sale or lease to the purchaser by the seller;

(f) The seller will refund all or part of the initial payment paid to the seller or will repurchase any of the products, equipment, or supplies provided by the seller or a person recommended or specified by the seller, if the purchaser is dissatisfied with the business; or

(g) The seller or a person recommended or specified by the seller will provide advice or training pertaining to the sale of any products, equipment, supplies, or services or use of any licensed material and the advice or training includes, but is not limited to, preparing or providing (i) promotional literature, brochures, pamphlets, or advertising materials, (ii) training regarding the promotion, operation, or management of the seller-assisted marketing plan, or (iii) operational, managerial, technical, or financial guidelines or assistance.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 599, § 16;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 42.